Hawaii statutes.
[ARTICLE
12.] INTERSTATE BRANCHING AND BANK

MERGERS

§412:12-101 Definitions. As used in
this article, unless a different meaning is required by the context, the
following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:

"Acquisition of a branch" means the
acquisition of a branch located in a host state, without engaging in an
"interstate merger transaction" as defined in this article.

"Bank" has the meaning set forth in
12 U.S.C. section 1813(h); provided that the term "bank" shall not
include any "foreign bank" as defined in 12 U.S.C. section 3101(7),
except that the term "bank" shall include any foreign bank organized
under the laws of a territory of the United States, Puerto Rico, Guam, American
Samoa, or the Virgin Islands, the deposits of which are insured by the Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation.

"Bank holding company" has the
meaning set forth in 12 U.S.C. section 1841(a)(1).

"Bank supervisory agency" means:

(1) Any agency of another state with primary
responsibility for chartering and supervising banks; and

(2) The Office of the Comptroller of the Currency,
the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Board of Governors of the
Federal Reserve System, and any successor to these agencies.

"Branch" means a place of business of a bank, other than its main
office, which is open to the public and at which deposits are received and
paid. The term does not include an automated teller machine as defined in
section 412:3-501.

"Control" shall be construed
consistently with 12 U.S.C. section 1841(a)(2).

"De novo branch" means a branch of a
bank located in a host state which:

(1) Is originally established by the bank as a
branch; and

(2) Does not become a branch of the bank as a result
of (A) the acquisition of another bank or a branch of another bank, or (B) the
merger, consolidation, or conversion involving any bank or branch.

"Foreign bank" has the meaning set
forth in 12 U.S.C. section 3101(7).

"Hawaii bank" means a bank whose home
state is Hawaii.

"Hawaii state bank" means a bank chartered
under the laws of Hawaii.

"Home state" means:

(1) With respect to a state bank, the state by which
the bank is chartered;

(2) With respect to a national bank, the state in
which the main office of the bank is located; and

(3) With respect to a foreign bank, the state
determined to be the home state of the foreign bank under 12 U.S.C. section
3103(c).

"Home state regulator" means, with
respect to an out-of-state state bank, the bank supervisory agency of the state
in which the bank is chartered.

"Host state" means a state, other
than the home state of a bank, in which the bank maintains, or seeks to
establish and maintain a branch.

"Interstate merger transaction"
means:

(1) The merger or consolidation of banks with
different home states, and the conversion of branches of any bank involved in
the merger or consolidation into branches of the resulting bank; or

(2) The purchase of all or substantially all of the
assets (including all or substantially all of the branches) of a bank whose
home state is different from the home state of the acquiring bank.

"Out-of-state bank" means a bank
whose home state is a state other than Hawaii.

"Out-of-state state bank" means a
bank chartered under the laws of any state other than Hawaii.

"Resulting bank" means a bank that
has resulted from an interstate merger transaction under this article.

"State", whenever this word is used
in its uncapitalized form, means any state of the United States, the District
of Columbia, any territory of the United States, Puerto Rico, Guam, American
Samoa, the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands, the Virgin Islands, and the
Northern Mariana Islands. [L 1996, c 155, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next